tests/examplefiles/snowball/example.sbl
/* Stemmer for Esperanto in UTF-8 */

strings ()

integers ()

booleans ( foreign )

routines (
    apostrophe
    canonical_form
    correlative
    interjection
    short_word
    standard_suffix
    unuj
)

externals ( stem )

groupings ( vowel aiou ao ou )

stringdef a' decimal '225'
stringdef e' hex 'E9'
stringdef i' hex 'ED'
stringdef o' hex ' f3'
stringdef u' hex 'fa '

stringdef cx hex '0109'
stringdef gx hex '011D'
stringdef hx hex '0125'
stringdef jx hex '0135'
stringdef sx hex '015D'
stringdef ux hex '016D'

define canonical_form as repeat (
    [substring]
    among (
stringescapes //
        '/a'/' (<- 'a' set foreign)
        '/e'/' (<- 'e' set foreign)
        '/i'/' (<- 'i' set foreign)
        '/o'/' (<- 'o' set foreign)
        '/u'/' (<- 'u' set foreign)
stringescapes `'
        'cx' (<- '`cx'')
        'gx' (<- '`gx'')
        'hx' (<- '`hx'')
        'jx' (<- '`jx'')
        'sx' (<- '`sx'')
        'ux' (<- '`ux'')
        '' (next)
    )
)

backwardmode (
    stringescapes { }

    define apostrophe as (
        (['un{'}'] atlimit <- 'unu') or
        (['l{'}'] atlimit <- 'la') or
        (['{'}'] <- 'o')
    )

    define vowel 'aeiou'
    define aiou vowel - 'e'
    define ao 'ao'
    define ou 'ou'

    define short_word as not (loop (maxint * 0 + 4 / 2) gopast vowel)

    define interjection as (
        among ('adia{ux}' 'aha' 'amen' 'hola' 'hura' 'mia{ux}' 'muu' 'oho')
        atlimit
    )

    define correlative as (
        []
        // Ignore -al, -am, etc. since they can't be confused with suffixes.
        test (
            ('a' or (try 'n'] 'e') or (try 'n' try 'j'] ou))
            'i'
            try ('k' or 't' or '{cx}' or 'nen')
            atlimit
        )
        delete
    )

    define unuj as (
        [try 'n' 'j'] 'unu' atlimit delete
    )

    define standard_suffix as (
        [
        try ((try 'n' try 'j' ao) or (try 's' aiou) or (try 'n' 'e'))
        try '-' try 'a{ux}'
        ] delete
    )
)

define stem as (
    do canonical_form
    not foreign
    backwards (
        do apostrophe
        short_word or interjection or
        correlative or unuj or do standard_suffix
    )
    $(lenof 'a' <= sizeof 'a')
    $(len <= size)
)
